North Carolina, session 2025, SB896.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), the sum of one hundred twenty
million eight hundred thousand dollars ($120,800,000) in recurring funds beginning in the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to increase to seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per 15-minute
increment the Medicaid rate paid for personal care services pursuant to Medicaid Clinical
Coverage Policies 3L, 3K-1, and 3K-2 provided to Medicaid beneficiaries through the State Plan
Personal Care Services Program (PCS), Community Alternatives Program for Children (CAP/C),
Community Alternatives Program for Disabled Adults (CAP/DA), and Community Alternatives
Program Choice (CAP/CO). These funds shall provide a State match for two hundred sixteen
million two hundred thousand dollars ($216,200,000) in recurring federal funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year, and those funds are appropriated to DHB for the same purpose.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), the sum of twenty million one
hundred thousand dollars ($20,100,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to be used to increase to sixteen dollars and twenty-five cents ($16.25) per 15-minute
increment the Medicaid rate paid for private duty nursing services pursuant to Medicaid Clinical
Coverage Policies 3G-1: Private Duty Nursing for Beneficiaries Age 21 and Older and 3G-2:
Private Duty Nursing for Beneficiaries Under 21 Years of Age. These funds shall provide a State
match for thirty-five million nine hundred thousand dollars ($35,900,000) in recurring federal
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, and those funds are appropriated to DHB for the same
purpose.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S896-v-1*